Washington statutes.
RCW 17.24.141

Penalties—Criminal and civil penalty.

Whenever the director finds that a person has committed a violation of any of the provisions of this chapter, and that violation has not been punished pursuant to RCW 17.24.100, the director may impose upon and collect from the violator a civil penalty not exceeding five thousand dollars per violation. Each violation shall be a separate and distinct offense. A person who knowingly, through an act of commission or omission, procures or aids or abets in the violation shall be considered to have violated this section and may be subject to the civil penalty.

[ 1991 c 257 s 18.]